Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Unit of Civil Air Patrol

36.230.
Unit of Civil Air Patrol — Head of unit.

There shall be a Unit of Civil Air Patrol in the Department of Military Affairs. The unit shall consist of the Kentucky wing of the Civil Air Patrol and any other units and personnel as are added by administrative order.

The commanding officer or his designee of the Kentucky wing of the Civil Air Patrol shall be ex officio the head of the unit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 258, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

36.235.
Functions of unit.

The Unit of Civil Air Patrol established pursuant to KRS

36.230

shall perform emergency disaster work within the Commonwealth in all instances in which aeronautical equipment and maneuvers might be of assistance in relieving the disaster, and shall engage in all manner of air search and rescue for which the Civil Air Patrol is fitted. The head may establish facilities for aeronautical education and training.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 258, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

36.240.
Coordination of unit activities with federal government.

The adjutant general shall coordinate the activities of the Unit of Civil Air Patrol established pursuant to KRS

36.230

with the federal government and any of its agencies in all matters relating to aeronautical training and education, communications, rescue work, mercy missions, aerial observation, establishment of navigational aids, and other functions within the scope of activity of the Civil Air Patrol.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 258, § 3, effective July 15, 1996.

36.245.
Use of appropriations — Restrictions.

No portion of moneys appropriated for the Unit of the Civil Air Patrol established pursuant to KRS

36.230

shall be expended without the approval of the adjutant general nor shall they be expended for the purchase of uniforms for any member of the Civil Air Patrol.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 258, § 4, effective July 15, 1996.

36.250.
Definitions for KRS 36.250 to 36.270.

As used in KRS

36.250

to

36.270

:

“Board” means the Kentucky Community Crisis Response Board;

“Community crisis response team” means the statewide membership of trained volunteers that provide crisis response services under the direction of the board;

“Crisis response services” means consultation, risk assessment, referral, and on-site crisis intervention services to persons impacted by crisis or disaster, but shall not be construed to include any services performed or intended to be performed by any other agency of the Commonwealth, any of its subdivisions, or any private party under KRS Chapter 224 or 39;

“Debriefing session” means the crisis response services rendered during or after a crisis or disaster; and

“Local community crisis response team” means a team formed to provide crisis response services in a county, district, or region and which operates in accordance with protocols and procedures established by the board.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 1998, ch. 86, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

36.255.
Kentucky Community Crisis Response Board — Members — Meetings.

The Kentucky Community Crisis Response Board is hereby created as a separate administrative body of state government within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12 and attached for administrative purposes to the Department of Military Affairs.

The membership of the board shall consist of the following:

The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, or the commissioner’s designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Public Health, or the commissioner’s designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Education, or the commissioner’s designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police, or the commissioner’s designee;

The Kentucky state fire marshal, or the fire marshal’s designee;

The executive director of the Division of Emergency Management, or the executive director’s designee;

The Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee;

One (1) representative of local community crisis response teams appointed by the Governor;

Four (4) members appointed by the Governor to represent mental health disciplines;

Two (2) members appointed by the Governor to represent emergency services disciplines;

One (1) member who is a mental health professional licensed for independent clinical practice, to be appointed by the Governor. The licensed mental health professional member shall serve as clinical director for the board;

One (1) member, appointed by the Governor, from a statewide chaplain’s association involved in emergency services, who is trained in grief counseling and has experience in crisis response;

One (1) member from the Kentucky Chapter of the American Red Cross; and

The commissioner of the Department for Community Based Services or the commissioner’s designee.

All board members appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(h) to (l) of this section shall be approved members of the existing community crisis response team.

All board members appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(h) to (l) of this section shall have demonstrated a commitment to the provision of community crisis response services.

The members of the board appointed by the Governor shall serve for two (2) years and may be reappointed for one (1) additional consecutive two (2) year term. All vacancies in appointed members’ terms shall be filled by appointment of the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The board shall elect annually from its membership a chairperson and shall establish other officers and committees as needed to execute the duties of the board.

The board shall meet at least quarterly, and a majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the board’s business.

Except for hired and appointed staff, no board member or team member shall receive compensation. However, board members and crisis response team members may receive reimbursement for expenses incurred in the course of providing crisis response services or executing the duties of the board, consistent with state policy governing the reimbursement of state employees for food, travel, and lodging. Except as provided for in KRS

36.260

, nothing in the provisions of KRS

36.250

to

36.270

shall be construed to create liability of a private party for expenses incurred or reimbursed under this subsection.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 1998, ch. 86, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 83, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 102, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 119, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 146, § 6, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 7, effective July 12, 2012.

36.260.
Duties of board.

The board shall:

Establish and maintain necessary offices, appoint an executive director, and hire other employees as necessary and prescribe their duties and compensation;

Recruit and train volunteer members who shall comprise the community crisis response team;

Maintain a team of volunteer members to provide crisis response services statewide;

Provide technical assistance for the development of local community crisis response teams;

Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A relating to the operation of crisis response services;

Provide training programs on the operation of the crisis response teams and the provision of crisis response services;

Develop agreements with agencies in both the public and private sectors;

Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A as necessary to execute the duties of the board;

Make recommendations to the Governor and to the General Assembly related to the planning and provision of crisis response services; and

Receive funding from any source and apply for public and private grants as it deems necessary.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 1998, ch. 86, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

36.265.
Attorney General to represent board members in civil proceedings.

If any member of the board or any member of a crisis response team authorized by KRS

36.250

to

36.270

does any act in the discharge of his duty that causes him to be proceeded against by civil court action, the Attorney General shall represent him in the civil proceedings.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 1998, ch. 86, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

36.270.
Status of state and local government employees acting on behalf of board.

Whenever the employees of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any county, urban-county, charter county, or city government, are rendering outside aid pursuant to the authority contained in KRS

36.250

to

36.270

, those employees shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities as if they were performing their duties in the jurisdiction in which they are normally employed.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 1998, ch. 86, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

36.300.
Department of Veterans’ Affairs attached to Office of Governor — Organization. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

36.310.
Advisory Board for Veterans’ Affairs — Membership — Meetings — Duties. [Repealed and reenacted.]

36.320.
Officers — Records.
[Repealed.]

36.330.
Duties of Department of Veterans’ Affairs. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

36.340.
State veterans’ cemeteries — Administrative regulations — Funding. [Repealed and reenacted.]

36.350.
Purpose of KRS 36.355. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

36.355.
Veterans’ nursing homes — Attachment to Finance and Administration Cabinet — Administrative regulations — Funding. [Repealed and reenacted.]

36.360.
Authorization to apply for issuance of revenue bonds — Other financial arrangements. [Repealed and reenacted.]

36.370.
Revenue bonds — Provisions — Exempt from taxation — Negotiability — Conditions in authorizing resolution — Sale of bonds — Prior consent not required. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]